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DTC P0325/52 Knock Sensor 1 Circuit (Bank 1 orSingle
Sensor)

DTC P0330/55 Knock Sensor 2 Circuit (Bank 2)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Each knock sensor is fitted to the right bank and left bank of the cylinder block to detect engine knocking.
This sensor contains a piezoelectric element which generates a voltage when it becomes deformed. The
piezoelectric element sends a signal to the engine control ECU, when the cylinder block vibrates due to
knocking. If engine knocking occurs, ignition timing is retarded to suppress it.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P0325/52
Outputvoltageof theknocksensor 1 decreasesbeyonda
threshold (thresholdvariesaccording toanenginespeed)with
enginespeed2,000 rpmto5,000 rpm( 1 tripdetection logic)

SOpenorshort inknocksensor 1 circuit
SKnocksensor 1 (looseness)
SEnginecontrolECU

P0330/55
Outputvoltageof theknocksensor2decreasesbeyonda
threshold (thresholdvariesaccording toanenginespeed)with
enginespeed2,000 rpmto5,000 rpm( 1 tripdetection logic)

SOpenorshort inknocksensor2circuit
SKnocksensor2 (looseness)
SEnginecontrolECU

HINT:
S Bank 1 refers to thebank that includescylinderNo. 1.
S Bank2refers the thebank thatdoesnot includecylinderNo. 1.

Reference: INSPECTION USING OSCILLOSCOPE
S With theengine racing (4,000 rpm),check thewaveform

between terminalsKNK 1 andKNK2of theenginecontrol
ECU connector and body ground.

HINT:
The correct waveform is as shown.
S Spread the timeon thehorizontalaxis,andconfirm that

periodof thewave is0. 13msec. (Normalmodevibration
frequencyofknocksensor:8. 1 kHz)

HINT:
Ifnormalmodevibration frequency isnot8. 1 kHz, thesensor
has malfunction.
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MONITOR DESCRIPTION
The knock sensor located on the cylinder block, detects spark knock.
Whensparkknockoccurs, thesensorpick −upvibrates inaspecific frequency range.When theenginecon-
trol ECU detects the voltage in this frequency range, it retards the ignition timing to suppress the spark knock.
The engine control ECU also senses background engine noise with the knock sensor and uses this noise
tocheck for faults in thesensor. If theknocksensorsignal level is too low formore than 10sec.,and if the
knock sensor output voltage is out of normal range, the engine control ECU interprets this as a fault in the
knock sensor and sets a DTC.
Thismonitor runafterengine iswarmedup(EngineCoolantTemperature (ECT) is60 ˚ Cormore)and the
vehicle isdrivenover40km/h for 1 minutes.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
S DTCP0325 is for thebank 1 knocksensorcircuit.
S DTCP0330 is for thebank2knocksensorcircuit.
S Read freeze framedatausing thehand −held tester.Freeze framedata records theengineconditions

when a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the
vehiclewas runningorstopped, if theenginewaswarmedupornot, if theair −fuel ratiowas leanor
rich, as well as other data from the time when a malfunction occurred.

1 Connecthand −held tester,andcheckknocksensorcircuit.

PREPARATION:
(a)Connecthand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b)Disconnect theEC 1 connector.
(c)Connect the terminalsof thedisconnectedEC 1 malecon-

nectorandEC 1 femaleas follows.

Maleconnector � Femaleconnector

Terminal2 � Terminal3

Terminal3 � Terminal2

(d)Turn ignitionswitchONandpush thehand −held tester
main switch ON.

(e) After the engine is warmed up, perform quick racing to
4,000 rpm 3 times.

CHECK:
Check the DTC.
RESULT:

Type I
DTC same as when vehicle brought in
P0325 � P0325orP0330 � P0330

Type II
DTC different to when vehicle brought in

P0325 � P0330orP0330 � P0325

Type II Go to step 3.

Type I
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2 Check for open and short in harness and connector between EC1 connector and
engine control ECU (See page IN−20).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
RM630E, page FI−74).

3 Check for open and short in harness and connector between EC1 connector and
knock sensor (See page IN−20).

HINT:
S IfDTCP0325haschanged toP0330,check theknocksensorcircuit on thebank 1 side.
S IfDTCP0330haschanged toP0325,check theknocksensorcircuit on thebank2side.

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Replace knock sensor.


